New York, session 2025-2026, S10560.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 116 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 116. Prohibitions on timeout boxes in schools. 1. The use of timeout 4 boxes, closets or other secluded physical enclosures for the isolation 5 of children are prohibited in schools in the state, except for the 6 authorized limited use of timeout and physical restraint as prescribed 7 in the commissioner's regulations. 8 2. For purposes of this section: 9 (a) "Timeout box" shall include, but not be limited to, a wooden or 10 padded room or structure where a child is isolated. 11 (b) "School" means a public school district, board of cooperative 12 educational services, charter school, state-operated and state-supported 13 school pursuant to articles eighty-five, eighty-seven and eighty-eight 14 of this chapter, in-state and out-of-state private residential or non- 15 residential school for the education of students with disabilities 16 approved pursuant to article eighty-nine of this chapter or operating 17 under article eighty-one of this chapter, state-administered prekinder- 18 garten program directly operated by a school district, board of cooper- 19 ative educational services, or an eligible agency, as defined in 8 NYCRR 20 151-1.2 (b), or operated by a school district in collaboration with an 21 eligible agency, preschool special education program approved pursuant 22 to section four thousand four hundred ten of this chapter, and regis- 23 tered nonpublic nursery school, kindergarten, and high school, and a 24 nonpublic school serving grades one through eight that has a registered 25 high school, in this state. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15984-01-6